Texas statutes.
GOVERNMENT CODE

TITLE 7. INTERGOVERNMENTAL RELATIONS

CHAPTER 782. CULTURAL BASIN ACT

Sec. 782.001. SHORT TITLE. This chapter may be cited as the Cultural Basin Act of 1973.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 38, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Sec. 782.002. PURPOSE. The purpose of this chapter is to improve the quality of life for the residents of Texas by:

(1) stimulating orderly economic and socially desirable development; and

(2) conserving and utilizing the state's human and natural resources.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 38, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Sec. 782.003. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Commission" means a cultural basin commission.

(2) "Council of government" means a regional planning commission or similar regional planning agency created under Chapter 391, Local Government Code.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 38, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Sec. 782.004. CREATION. (a) The governor shall designate a geographical area in the state as a cultural basin if:

(1) there is a commonality within the area, based on cultural, historical, and economic factors;

(2) the areas of commonality within the proposed cultural basin are contiguous; and

(3) state planning regions may be used as building blocks for the formation of the cultural basin.

(b) The governor shall designate no fewer than four and no more than seven cultural basins.

(c) Each of three major metropolitan areas should be in separate cultural basins.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 38, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Sec. 782.005. GREATER SOUTH TEXAS CULTURAL BASIN. (a) The Greater South Texas Cultural Basin is designated as the first cultural basin.

(b) The experience of the Greater South Texas Cultural Basin Commission shall be used in the formulation and development of additional cultural basin commissions.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 38, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Sec. 782.006. COMMISSION. (a) The governor shall appoint a commission for each cultural basin the governor designates.

(b) A commission shall meet quarterly and at other times as called by a majority of the commission members or the commission chairman.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 38, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Sec. 782.007. COMMISSION MEMBERSHIP. (a) A commission is composed of the following members appointed by the governor:

(1) five local citizens;

(2) the presiding officer of each council of government in the cultural basin;

(3) six administrative heads of state agencies; and

(4) five representatives of federal agencies.

(b) Members of a commission serve for terms of two years.

(c) The governor serves as the chairman of each cultural basin commission.

(d) A member of the commission is entitled to reimbursement for actual expenses incurred in the performance of the member's duties if the expenses are not reimbursed from another source.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 38, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Sec. 782.008. DUTIES OF CERTAIN COMMISSION MEMBERS. (a) Members of the commission who are citizen representatives or local officials shall:

(1) establish local and basin-wide goals and priorities; and

(2) make management and policy decisions.

(b) The members of a commission who are presiding officers of councils of government shall:

(1) coordinate the efforts, programs, goals, and projects of the council with those of the cultural basin commission; and

(2) make management and policy decisions.

(c) The members of a commission who are state and federal agency representatives shall design programs and allocate funds to implement the goals set by the commission.

(d) The administrative heads of state agencies shall coordinate activities of the commission with all state agencies.

(e) A commission, in setting its local goals, shall:

(1) consult existing groups, including local human resource councils; and

(2) utilize information, studies, and proposed solutions to problems from citizen commissions, including the Rural Development Commission.

(f) The governor shall present plans and proposals of the commission for review to the appropriate state agencies and, along with the recommendations of the agencies, recommend to the legislature actions to be taken regarding the cultural basins.

(g) The governor shall provide an effective and continuing liaison between the federal government, state agencies, and all commissions.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 38, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Sec. 782.009. FUNCTIONS OF COMMISSION. (a) A commission shall, with respect to its cultural basin:

(1) foster surveys and studies to provide information for the preparation of plans and programs for the development of the cultural basin;

(2) advise and assist the governor in coordinating councils of government to maximize benefits from the expenditure of federal, state, and local funds;

(3) promote increased private investment in the cultural basin;

(4) prepare legislative and other recommendations for short-range and long-range programs and projects;

(5) develop, on a continuing basis, comprehensive and coordinated plans and programs for the cultural basin and establish priorities among these plans and programs, considering other federal, state, regional, and local plans;

(6) conduct and sponsor investigations, research, and studies, including an inventory and analysis of the resources of the cultural basin;

(7) in cooperation with federal, state, regional, and local agencies, sponsor demonstration projects to foster cultural basin productivity and growth;

(8) in cooperation with the agency involved, review and study federal, state, regional, and local public and private programs and recommend modifications or additions that increase the programs' effectiveness in the cultural basin;

(9) formulate and recommend interstate compacts and other forms of interstate cooperation;

(10) formulate and recommend international agreements between the United States and Mexico that have significant impact on the economy or delivery of services to the people of this state; and

(11) establish and use citizen input, advisory councils, and public conferences for the consideration of problems and solutions for the cultural basin.

(b) A commission may make recommendations to the legislature and to appropriate local officials regarding:

(1) the expenditure of funds by federal, state, and local agencies in the cultural basin in the areas of:

(A) natural resources;

(B) agriculture;

(C) education;

(D) training;

(E) health and welfare;

(F) transportation;

(G) recreation;

(H) public works; and

(I) other areas related to the purposes of this chapter; and

(2) additional state legislation or administrative actions necessary to further the purposes of this chapter.

(c) This chapter does not authorize a commission to approve or disapprove funding to a county, city, or council of government.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 38, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Sec. 782.010. ASSISTANCE BY GOVERNOR'S OFFICE AND STATE AGENCIES. (a) The governor's office shall provide technical assistance and staff support to assist a commission in the performance of its duties and to develop its recommendations and programs.

(b) Assistance must include:

(1) studies and plans evaluating the needs of and developing the potential for the economic growth of the cultural basin; and

(2) research on improving the conservation and use of human and natural resources in the basin.

(c) The governor's office may provide assistance to a commission through:

(1) members of the governor's staff;

(2) the payment of funds authorized by this section;

(3) contracts with private individuals, partnerships, firms, corporations, or suitable institutions; and

(4) grants to the commission.

(d) A state agency shall assist a commission in performing its functions.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 38, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Sec. 782.011. COORDINATION BY STATE AND FEDERAL AGENCIES. State and federal agencies shall coordinate existing programs and design state and federal programs through contact and communications with the members of a commission.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 38, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Sec. 782.012. BUDGETARY CONSIDERATIONS; FUNDS. (a) A commission is within the governor's office for budgetary purposes, with necessary expenses of operations financed by line-item appropriations to the governor's office.

(b) A commission may accept gifts and grants from a person. The funds received shall be deposited in the state treasury and may be used as appropriated by the legislature, subject to the limitations in the gift or grant and in accordance with the annual report or other recommendations of a commission.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 38, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Sec. 782.013. DEVELOPMENT GRANT. (a) The legislature shall appropriate a development grant fund. On receipt of a report under Section 782.008(f), the legislature may release appropriate development grant funds in block grant form to be used by a commission in accordance with the commission's report.

(b) The governor shall encourage each commission and reviewing state agency to follow procedures that consider the following factors when developing recommendations and funding for recommendations, setting priorities, and taking other appropriate actions:

(1) the relationship of the project to the overall cultural basin development, including its location in an area determined to have a significant potential for growth;

(2) the population and area to be served by the project and the relative per capita income and the unemployment rates in the area;

(3) the relative financial resources available to the state or political subdivision that will undertake the project;

(4) the importance of the project in relation to other projects that may be in competition for the same funds;

(5) the prospects that the project, on a continuing rather than a temporary basis, will improve the opportunities for employment, the average level of income, or the economic and social development of the area served by the project; and

(6) any possible environmental impact of the project.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 38, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.